Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-422
Actuarial opinions; life insurance company; additional requirements.

Every life insurance company, except as exempted by the director by rule or regulation, shall also annually include in the opinion required by section 44-421 an opinion of the same qualified actuary as to whether the reserves and related actuarial items held in support of the policies and contracts specified by the director, when considered in light of the assets held by the company with respect to the reserves and related actuarial items, including the investment earnings on the assets and the considerations anticipated to be received and retained under the policies and contracts, make adequate provision for the company's obligations under the policies and contracts, including the benefits under and expenses associated with the policies and contracts.

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 9.